Utah statutes.
40-9-103.   Participation by Utah.

(1)  The governor may appoint the director of the Division of Oil, Gas, and Mining to serve as the governor's official representative to the Interstate Mining Commission.

(2)  A copy of the bylaws of the Interstate Mining Commission shall be:

(a)  placed on file with the director of the Division of Oil, Gas, and Mining; and

(b)  available, at reasonable times, for inspection by the Legislature or an interested person.

(3)  As used in Article V (1), "agency of the party States" does not mean an agency of Utah.

(4)  A person or entity may not hold Utah liable for the obligations or solvency of:

(a)  the retirement system described in Article V (6); or

(b)  a program of employee benefits described in Article V (6).



Enacted by Chapter 459, 2013 General Session

